Utah statutes.
20A-2-107.   Designating or changing party affiliation -- Times permitted.

(1)  The county clerk shall:

(a)  record the party affiliation designated by the voter on the voter registration form as the voter's party affiliation; or

(b)  if no political party affiliation is designated by the voter on the voter registration form, record the voter's party affiliation as "unaffiliated."

(2) (a)  Any registered voter may designate or change the voter's political party affiliation by complying with the procedures and requirements of this Subsection (2).

(b)  A registered voter may designate or change the voter's political party affiliation by filing a signed form with the county clerk that identifies the registered political party with which the voter chooses to affiliate, during any period except the following:

(i)  the period beginning on the day after the voter registration deadline and continuing through the date of the regular primary election; and

(ii)  the period beginning on the day after the voter registration deadline and continuing through the date of the Western States Presidential Primary.

